Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-237.01
Written partnership agreement; admission of limited partner; assignment of interest; signatures.

A written partnership agreement (1) may provide that a person shall be admitted as a limited partner of a limited partnership or become an assignee of a partnership interest or other rights or powers of a limited partner to the extent assigned and shall become bound by the partnership agreement (i) if such person, or a representative authorized by such person orally, in writing, or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest, executes the partnership agreement or any other writing evidencing the intent of such person to become a limited partner or assignee or (ii) without such execution, if such person, or a representative authorized by such person orally, in writing, or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest, complies with the condition for becoming a limited partner or assignee as set forth in the partnership agreement or any other writing and requests, orally, in writing, or by other action such as payment for a partnership interest, that the records of the limited partnership reflect such admission or assignment and (2) shall not be unenforceable by reason of its not having been signed by a person being admitted as a limited partner or becoming an assignee as provided in this section or by reason of its having been signed by a representative as provided in this section.

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 10.